Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB530.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3304(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3304. Criminal mischief.* * *(b) Grading.--[Criminal mischief is a felony of the third degree if the actor intentionally causes pecuniary loss in excess of $5,000, or a substantial interruption or impairment of 123456789101112131415161718 public communication, transportation, supply of water, gas or power, or other public service. It is a misdemeanor of the second degree if the actor intentionally causes pecuniary loss in excess of $1,000, or a misdemeanor of the third degree if he intentionally or recklessly causes pecuniary loss in excess of $500 or causes a loss in excess of $150 for a violation of subsection (a)(4). Otherwise criminal mischief is a summary offense.] Criminal mischief shall be graded as:(1) a felony of the first degree if the actor unlawfully enters a building or occupied structure and intentionally causes pecuniary loss in excess of $1,000;(2) a felony of the third degree if the actor intentionally causes pecuniary loss in excess of $5,000 or a substantial interruption or impairment of public communication, transportation, supply of water, gas or power, or other public service;(3) a misdemeanor of the second degree if the actor intentionally causes pecuniary loss in excess of $1,000;(4) a misdemeanor of the third degree if the actor intentionally or recklessly causes pecuniary loss in excess of $500 or causes a loss in excess of $150 for a violation of subsection (a)(4); or(5) a summary offense if paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4) do not apply.* * *Section 2. Title 18 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3503.1. Removal of trespassers from real property. (a) Authorization to remove.--A law enforcement officer having probable cause based on an affidavit under subsection (d) to believe that a person on real property has no lawful right of 20250HB0530PN0523 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupancy or entry on the real property or is trespassing in violation of section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass), may remove the person from the premises.(b) Warrant.--If probable cause exists to believe that a person occupying a building or occupied structure has no lawful right of occupancy or entry based on an affidavit submitted under subsection (d) and no credible evidence demonstrating that the person is lawfully occupying the real property has been presented under subsection (c), a law enforcement officer may obtain a search warrant prior to entering the building or occupied structure.(c) Evidence of lawful occupation.--A law enforcement officer removing a person from real property under this section shall provide the person with a reasonable opportunity to secure and present credible evidence demonstrating that the person is an owner or tenant, a guest or invitee of an owner or tenant or otherwise lawfully occupying the real property.(d) Affidavit.--An owner, or an authorized agent of the owner, of real property may request removal of a person occupying the real property by providing to law enforcement a signed affidavit stating all of the following:(1) The affiant is the owner or authorized agent of the owner of real property located at a given address.(2) The person who is not licensed or privileged to do so has entered, occupied or remained on the real property.(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4), the person is not and, to the affiant's knowledge and belief, has not been a tenant at the address.(4) If the person is a former tenant, the person was lawfully evicted from the real property. The affiant shall 20250HB0530PN0523 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 include a copy of the eviction order with the affidavit.(5) The affiant has demanded that the person vacate the real property and the person has not done so.(6) The affiant understands that the statements contained in the affidavit are subject to the penalties for unsworn falsification to authorities under section 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(7) The affiant understands and acknowledges the prohibitions in the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, against taking or detaining a tenant's personal property or removing or excluding a tenant from residential property without an authorizing court order.(e) Savings clause.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to:(1) abrogate or otherwise limit the authority or jurisdiction of law enforcement otherwise provided by law; or(2) require a law enforcement officer to obtain an affidavit under subsection (d) before removing a person from a building or occupied structure if probable cause exists to believe that the person has no lawful right of occupancy or entry.(f) Illegal alien status.--If a law enforcement officer determines that a person who is unlawfully occupying real property in violation of section 3503 is an illegal alien, the law enforcement officer shall immediately provide notice to the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement of the person's status as an illegal alien. The law enforcement officer shall include with the notice all relevant information possessed by the law enforcement officer.20250HB0530PN0523 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (g) Immunity.--In addition to any other applicable immunity or limitation on civil liability, a law enforcement officer who, acting in good faith, removes a person from real property in accordance with this section shall not be subject to civil liability.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Illegal alien." A noncitizen of the United States who is residing in the United States without official authorization in violation of Federal immigration laws.Section 3. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8320.2. Trespass on real property.(a) Cause of action established.--An owner of real property shall have a cause of action against a person who knowingly or intentionally entered, gained entry by subterfuge or surreptitiously remained on the real property and refused the owner's demands to vacate the real property.(b) Treble damages and attorney fees.--In addition to any other relief prescribed by law, an owner of real property who brings suit and prevails under this section shall be awarded treble damages and reasonable attorney fees.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0530PN0523 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223